Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
OFFENDERS SUBJECT TO COLLECTION OF SPECIMENS OR SAMPLES, OR PRINT IMPRESSIONS

§844D-31 Offenders subject to collection. (a)
Any person, except for any juvenile, who is convicted of, or pleads guilty or
no contest to, any felony offense, even if the plea is deferred, or is found
not guilty by reason of insanity of any felony offense, shall provide buccal
swab samples and print impressions of each hand, and, if required by the
collecting agency's rules or internal regulations, blood specimens, required
for law enforcement identification analysis.

(b) Testing pursuant to this section shall
begin immediately for all persons who have been convicted of murder in any
degree or any felony offense defined in chapter 846E and all persons convicted
of any felony offense who are confined in a correctional facility or other
detention facility, including private correctional facilities, but shall not
begin for other persons until thirty days after statewide publication of notice
by the attorney general pursuant to section 1-28.5.

(c) The attorney general's notice, pursuant to
subsection (b), may be provided in stages, beginning with notice of the
beginning of testing of all persons not already mandated to be tested by
subsection (b) who have been convicted of a class A felony, then notice of the
beginning of testing of all persons not already mandated to be tested by
subsection (b) who have been convicted of a class B felony, and finally notice
of the beginning of testing of all persons not already mandated to be tested by
subsection (b) who have been convicted of a class C felony.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed
as prohibiting collection and analysis of specimens, samples, or print
impressions as a condition of a plea for a non-qualifying offense. [L 2005, c
112, pt of §1; am L 2006, c 144, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next